North Dakota, session 69, HB1379.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new subdivision to subsection 1 of section 57-38-01.3 of the North Dakota
Century Code is created and enacted as follows:
Reduced by the amount of net capital gain or increased by the amount of net
capital loss from the sale of gold and silver legal tender coins or bullion included
in taxable income or the computation of taxable income on the federal return. For
the purposes of this subdivision, "bullion" means precious metal that has been
refined to a purity of not less than nine hundred ninety - nine parts per one
thousand and is in such form or condition that its value depends on its precious
metal content and not its form.
SECTION 2. A new subdivision to subsection 2 of section 57-38-30.3 of the North Dakota
Century Code is created and enacted as follows:
Reduced by the amount of net capital gain or increased by the amount of net
capital loss for the taxable year from the sale of gold and silver legal tender coins
and bullion to the extent included in federal taxable income. The adjustment
provided by this subdivision is allowed only to the extent the net capital gain is
allocated to the state. For the purposes of this subdivision, "bullion" means
precious metal that has been refined to a purity of not less than nine hundred
Page No. 1 25.0809.02000

Sixty-ninth
Legislative Assembly
ninety - nine parts per one thousand and is in such form or condition that its value
depends on its precious metal content and not its form.
SECTION 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act is effective for taxable years beginning after
December 31, 2024.
Page No. 2 25.0809.02000